src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BIEKKASTITinfl
                       +Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3:              K      ;
                       +Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ij            K      ;
                        +Gram/3syll+Ind+ConNeg:a             K      ;
                           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg3:isj           K      ;
                        +Gram/3syll+Pot+ConNeg:itja          K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg3:is            ENDLEX ;
                       +Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Sg3:us            ENDLEX ;
                            +Gram/3syll+PrfPrc:am            K      ;
                               +Gram/3syll+Inf:it            K      ;
                              +Gram/3syll+Ger:attijn        K      ;
                               +Gram/3syll+Sup:ittjat        K      ;
                            +Gram/3syll+VAbess:ik            K      ;
                            +Gram/3syll+VAbess:ik            VUOHTA ;
                              +Gram/3syll+Gram/3syll+VGen:a             K      ;
                      +Gram/3syll+Imprt+ConNeg:a             ENDLEX ;
              +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:isj»goahte%>t K      ;
      +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:isj»goahtá%>  K      ;
      +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:isj»gådi%>j   K      ;
              +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Inf:»ahtja%>t     K      ;
      +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:»ahtjá%>      K      ;
      +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:»atjá%>j      K      ;
             +Der1+Der/ahttjá+V+Inf:»ahttjá%>t    K      ;
     +Der1+Der/ahttjá+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:»ahttjá%>     K      ;
     +Der1+Der/ahttjá+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:»ahttjá%>j    K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Nom:ibme          K      ;
                +Gram/3syll+Actio+Gen+Err/Orth:im            K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Gen:ime           K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Com:imijn         K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess:ime           K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess:imen          K      ;
                         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela:imes          K      ;
       +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»im%>         R      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»ibme%>       K      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»ime%>v       K      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ime%>        K      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»ibmá%>j      K      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ine:»ime%>n       K      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ela:»ime%>s       K      ;
          +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»imi%>jn      K      ;
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»imi%>jna     K      ; !
             +Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»ibme%>n      K      ;

LEXICON JÅRGESTIT_IV !!= @CODE@At the moment IV, we may perhaps change IV/TV. 
      +IV:%>       JÅRGESTITStem         ;
      +IV:         DeverbalVerbsJÅLLÅRIT ;
      +IV:         SG3PASS               ;
 +IV+Cond:%>»alulu V-ODD-PRET            ; ! gives jårgestaluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström


!!€gt-norm: doalvestit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ doalvestav:           doalvestit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ doalvestiv:           doalvestit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ doalvestijma:         doalvestit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BEGATJIT_IV  !!= @CODE@ Words ending -tjit, -jdit, reciprocals on -dit, momentatives on -dit, -edit, continuatives on -ldit, -nit, essives on -hit and 5-syllables - no actio cmps, but  only Sg3 passivereintroduced
                   +IV:%>        BEGATJITStem              ;
                   +IV:          SG3PASS                   ; !
  +IV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%>  INFL-EVEN                 ; !Inchoative
  +IV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja    DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative
 +IV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá%> INFL-CONTRACTED           ; !Inchoative
 +IV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá   DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT     ; !Inchoative
              +IV+Cond:%>»alulu  V-ODD-PRET                ;

!!€gt-norm: duojkkuhit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ duojkkuhav:           duojkkuhit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ duojkkuhiv:           duojkkuhit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ duojkkuhijma:         duojkkuhit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1


LEXICON MÅRIJDIT_IV  !!= @CODE@ Words ending -IJDIT. Same as BEGATJIT, but a common error is to write "jårgidit", so the whole -ijdit and Err/Orth -idit is made in this  lexicon

         :ijd9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
+Err/Orth:id9  BEGATJIT_IV ;



LEXICON BALÁDIT_IV  !!= @CODE@ continuatives on -dit, frequentatives on -odit, reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio cpms, only Sg3 passive
                   +IV:%>        JÅRGESTITStem             ;
                   +IV:          SG3PASS                   ;
  +IV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%>  INFL-EVEN                 ; !Inchoative
  +IV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja    DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative
 +IV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá%> INFL-CONTRACTED           ; !Inchoative
 +IV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá   DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT     ; !Inchoative
              +IV+Cond:%>»alulu  V-ODD-PRET                ;


!!€gt-norm: lihtudit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ lihtudav:           lihtudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ lihtudiv:           lihtudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ lihtudijma:         lihtudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON SUOGNALIT_IV !!= @CODE@ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit.  only Sg3 passive
      +IV:%>       JÅRGESTITStem           ;
      +IV:         DeverbalVerbsVUORDDELIT ;
      +IV:         SG3PASS                 ;
 +IV+Cond:%>»alulu V-ODD-PRET              ;


!!€gt-norm: loavkkalit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ loavkkalav:           loavkkalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ loavkkaliv:           loavkkalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ loavkkalijma:         loavkkalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON LASSÁNIT_IV !!= @CODE@ verbs ending -nit, -sit, no passive
            +IV:%>          JÅRGESTITStem          ;
            +IV:            DeverbalVerbsLASSÁNIT  ;
+IV+Cond:%>»alulu    V-ODD-PRET             ;

!!€gt-norm: rievddánit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rievddánav:           rievddánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ rievddániv:           rievddánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ rievddánijma:         rievddánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BÁHTARIT_IV !!= @CODE@verbs ending -rit.  only Sg3 passive
      +IV:%>       JÅRGESTITStem         ;
      +IV:         DeverbalVerbsLASSÁNIT ;
      +IV:         SG3PASS               ;
 +IV+Cond:%>»alulu V-ODD-PRET            ;


!!€gt-norm: sjtávttjurit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sjtávttjurav:            sjtávttjurit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ sjtávttjuriv:            sjtávttjurit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ sjtávttjurijma:          sjtávttjurit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1



LEXICON UNNEDIT_TV !!= @CODE@  All -uvvat passives.
            +TV:%>          UNNEDITStem           ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsJÅLLÅRIT ;
            +TV:            ODD-PASSIVE           ;
+IV+Cond:%>»alulu    V-ODD-PRET            ;

!!€gt-norm: nuoledit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ nuoledav:            nuoledit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ nuolediv:            nuoledit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ nuoledijma:          nuoledit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
