src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
badjunit+V:badjun LASSÁNIT_IV ;
basodit+V:basod9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
biedalit+V:biedal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
bisánit+V:bisán LASSÁNIT_IV ;
bitjádit+V:bitjád9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
boahkkodit+V:boahkkod9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
boaldedit+V:boalded9 JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
báhtarit+V:báhtar BÁHTARIT_IV ;
báhtsadit+V:báhtsad9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
bánntsurit+V:bánntsur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
bánntsárit+V:bánntsár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
bárijdit+V:bár MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
bátsadit+V:bátsad9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
bávtjestit+V:bávtjest JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
båjkådit+V:båjkåd9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
bållurit+V:bållur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
bårjjånit+V:bårjjån LASSÁNIT_IV ;
bægádit+V:bægád9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
dabrijdit+V:dabr MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
darssalit+V:darssal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
diehtostit+V:diehtost UNNEDIT_TV ;
dublledit+V:dublled9 JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
dullárit+V:dullár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
duobmanit+V:duobman LASSÁNIT_IV ;
dåmajdit+V:dåmajd9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
dæhppodit+V:dæhppod9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
dælkkanit+V:dælkkan LASSÁNIT_IV ;
ganástit+V:ganást JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
gerjudit+V:gerjud9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
gerralit+V:gerral SUOGNALIT_IV ;
giebddurit+V:giebddur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
giejvijdit+V:giejv MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
giellodit+V:giellod9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
ginntsurit+V:ginntsur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
gisjkadit+V:gisjkad9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
goabrránit+V:goabrrán LASSÁNIT_IV ;
goallostit+V:goallost UNNEDIT_TV ;
guggŋahit+V:guggŋah9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
guojedit+V:guojed9 JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
guosmijdit+V:guosm MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
guvnjádit+V:guvnjád9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
gáhkkárit+V:gáhkkár BALÁDIT_IV ;
gáhtolit+V:gáhtol SUOGNALIT_IV ;
gájmmárit+V:gájmmár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
gárijdit+V:gár MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
gávvodit+V:gávvod9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
gåhppedit+V:gåhpped9 JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
gåhttsådit+V:gåhttsåd9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
gånatjit+V:gånatj BEGATJIT_IV ;
gårrasit+V:gårras LASSÁNIT_IV ;
gårvijdit+V:gårv MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
hamujit+V:hamuj BALÁDIT_IV ;
hihkalit+V:hihkal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
hilijdit+V:hil MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
hullárit+V:hullár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
hállánit+V:hállán LASSÁNIT_IV ;
hávkkadit+V:hávkkad9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
idatjit+V:idatj BEGATJIT_IV ;
jalgijdit+V:jalg MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
jielastit+V:jielast JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
jierijdit+V:jier MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
jumájdit+V:jumájd9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
juskadit+V:juskad9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
jutsijdit+V:juts MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
jáddurit+V:jáddur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
jávvásit+V:jávvás LASSÁNIT_IV ;
jåhtålit+V:jåhtål SUOGNALIT_IV ;
jållårit+V:jålºlår BÁHTARIT_IV ;
koastedit+V:koasted9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
labmahit+V:labmah9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
lavkadit+V:lavkad9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
livkkalit+V:livkkal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
livudit+V:livud9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
loanedit+V:loaned9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
lulestit+V:lulest JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
luorkijdit+V:luork MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
láddanit+V:láddan LASSÁNIT_IV ;
lådalit+V:lådal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
låsjkijdit+V:låsjk MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
manedit+V:maned9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
muoladit+V:muolad9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
muolostit+V:muolost JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
muolunit+V:muolun LASSÁNIT_IV ;
murddelit+V:murddel SUOGNALIT_IV ;
mássjurit+V:mássjur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
mæddalit+V:mæddal BALÁDIT_IV ;
nahtsijdit+V:nahts MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
nimmurit+V:nimmur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
njimmurit+V:njimmur BÁHTARIT_IV ;
njáhkalit+V:njáhkal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
njálmostit+V:njálmost JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
njámmasit+V:njámmas LASSÁNIT_IV ;
njárbbidit+V:njárbbid9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
njålgijdit+V:njålg MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
njålgådit+V:njålgåd9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
nållahit+V:nållah9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
rudnalit+V:rudnal BALÁDIT_IV ;
ruohtastit+V:ruohtast JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
ruovddádit+V:ruosád9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
ráfedit+V:ráfed9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
rájnnanit+V:rájnnan LASSÁNIT_IV ;
salostit+V:salost JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
sievtijdit+V:sievt MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
sirralit+V:sirral SUOGNALIT_IV ;
sjpoanjgedit+V:sjpoanjged9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
sjuddárit+V:sjuddár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
sjuovvanit+V:sjuovvan LASSÁNIT_IV ;
sjuvggalit+V:sjuvggal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
skielbestit+V:skielbest JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
skihppádit+V:skihppád9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
skinjijdit+V:skinj MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
skirrodit+V:skirrod9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
skoaddálit+V:skoaddál SUOGNALIT_IV ;
småkkudit+V:småkkud9 JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
snarralit+V:snarral SUOGNALIT_IV ;
snjibtjádit+v1+V:snjibtjád9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
snjurgudit+v2+V:sjnjurgud9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
stuhtjalit+V:stuhtjal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
stuvssárit+V:stuvssár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
stæggasit+V:stæggas LASSÁNIT_IV ;
suogŋalit+V:suogŋal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
suomastit+V:suomast JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
suorggidit+V:suorggid9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
suvrijdit+V:suvr MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
sållårit+V:sållår BÁHTARIT_IV ;
tjadnahit+V:tjadnah9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
tjielastit+V:tjielast JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
tjierudit+V:tjierud9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
tjuodtjánit+V:tjuodtján LASSÁNIT_IV ;
tjuokkudit+V:tjuokkud9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
tjuovgijdit+V:tjuovg MÅRIJDIT_IV ;
tjágŋalit+V:tjágŋal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
tsieskedit+V:tsiesked9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
tsuovganit+V:tsuovgan LASSÁNIT_IV ;
valkadit+V:valkad9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
vartjadit+V:vartjad JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
verastit+V:verast UNNEDIT_TV ;
vuodalit+V:vuodal SUOGNALIT_IV ;
vuoladit+V:vuolad9 BALÁDIT_IV ;
váldestit+V:váldest UNNEDIT_TV ;
ádjánit+V+Err/Orth:ádjan LASSÁNIT_IV ;
ármmadit+V:ármmad9 JÅRGESTIT_IV ;
årojdit+V:årojd9 BEGATJIT_IV ;
æjvvárit+V:æjvvár BÁHTARIT_IV ;
ævtodit+V:ævtod9 UNNEDIT_TV ;
